Utah statutes.
4-38-13.   Race meet escrow.

Each race meet licensee shall deposit in escrow all added money and money from payment races in a FDIC bank that has received prior approval from the commission.  All payment deposits shall be made in a timely manner determined by the commission, and each licensee shall provide proof of deposits as required by the commission.



Enacted by Chapter 296, 1992 General Session

